District of Columbia statutes.
21-144

Property subject to liens.

When an infant is entitled to real or personal estate in the District of Columbia which is liable to a mortgage, trust, or lien, or is in any way charged with the payment of money, the court may decree in the case as if the infant were of full age.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 742, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Cross References

Mortgages, rights of infants, see §§ 42-808 and 42-809.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-144.
1973 Ed., § 21-144.